Utah statutes.
23-20-4.7.   Habitual wanton destruction of protected wildlife -- Third degree felony.

(1)  A person is guilty of habitual wanton destruction of protected wildlife if the person:

(a)  takes a big game animal in violation of Section 23-20-4; and

(b)  within seven years of the day on which the violation described in Subsection (1)(a) occurs, has twice been convicted of taking a big game animal in violation of Section 23-20-4.

(2)  "Convicted," for purposes of this section, includes a guilty adjudication, guilty plea, no contest plea, and guilty or no contest plea entered in a plea in abeyance agreement under Title 77, Chapter 2a, Pleas in Abeyance.

(3)  Habitual wanton destruction of protected wildlife is a third degree felony.

